Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2971.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 32, chapter 43, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 32-4305, to read: START_STATUTE32-4305. Initial license, registration and certification fees; deferment Notwithstanding any other law, a person shall pay the initial license, registration or certification fee for any profession or occupation that is licensed, registered or certified pursuant to this title at the beginning of the second year the person is licensed, registered or certified in this state. END_STATUTE